Hawaii statutes.
§621-12 Oath; affirmation. Every court
and person having authority to hear, receive, and examine evidence may
administer the following oath-affirmation to all witnesses legally called
before them: Do you solemnly swear or affirm that the testimony you are about
to give will be the truth, the whole truth and nothing but the truth? [L 1876,
c 32, §48; RL 1925, §2614; RL 1935, §3821; RL 1945, §9832; RL 1955, §222-12;
HRS §621-12; am L 1972, c 104, §1(g); am L 1973, c 155, §1]

Cross References

Oaths, generally, see §1-21.

Rules of Court

As to acceptance of affirmation in lieu of oath, see HRCP
rule 43(d); DCRCP rule 43(d).

Case Notes

The judicial oath in common use is a legal oath. 8 H. 259
(1891).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next